Massachusetts, session 194th, H1017.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts Division of Fisheries and Wildlife shall amend its
regulations to grant priority access to Antlerless Deer Permits (ADPs) for veteran hunters who
have a disability certified by the VA. In areas where the demand for ADPs exceeds the available
permits, certified disabled veteran hunters shall be guaranteed the issuance of an ADP before any
other applicants.
SECTION 2. The Massachusetts Division of Fisheries and Wildlife shall establish an
application process for certified disabled veteran hunters to apply for priority ADPs. This process
shall include criteria for certifying disability status and the procedures for applying for these
permits.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect immediately upon its passage.
of 1